Missouri, session 2026, SB1395.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 484.020, RSMo, is repealed and one new
section enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as section 484.020,
to read as follows:
484.020. 1. No person shall engage in the practice of
law or do law business, as defined in section 484.010, or
both, unless he shall have been duly licensed therefor and
while his license therefor is in full force and effect, nor
shall any association, partnership, limited liability
company or corporation, except a professional corporation
organized pursuant to the provisions of chapter 356, a
limited liability company organized and registered pursuant
to the provisions of chapter 347, or a limited liability
partnership organized or registered pursuant to the
provisions of chapter 358, engage in the practice of the law
or do law business as defined in section 484.010, or both.
2. Unless duly licensed in this state to practice law
or law business, it shall be an unauthorized practice of law
subject to injunctive relief and liability under subsection
3 of this section for any person, association, partnership,
limited liability company, or corporation to provide,
EXPLANATION-Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in this bill is not enacted
and is intended to be omitted in the law.

SB 1395 2
regardless of whether compensation is paid, papers,
pleadings, or documents to be used in connection with
proceedings pending or prospective before any court of
record, commissioner, referee or any body, board, committee,
or commission constituted by law or having authority to
settle controversies that are produced or generated by the
use of artificial intelligence. As used in this subsection,
the term "artificial intelligence" means a machine-based
system that can, for a given set of human-defined
objectives, make predictions, recommendations, or decisions
influencing real or virtual environments.
3. Any person, association, partnership, limited
liability company or corporation who shall violate the
foregoing prohibition of this section shall be guilty of a
misdemeanor and upon conviction therefor shall be punished
by a fine not exceeding one hundred dollars and costs of
prosecution and shall be subject to be sued for treble the
amount which shall have been paid him or it for any service
rendered in violation hereof by the person, firm,
association, partnership, limited liability company or
corporation paying the same within two years from the date
the same shall have been paid and if within said time such
person, firm, association, partnership, limited liability
company or corporation shall neglect and fail to sue for or
recover such treble amount, then the state of Missouri shall
have the right to and shall sue for such treble amount and
recover the same and upon the recovery thereof such treble
amount shall be paid into the treasury of the state of
Missouri.
[3.] 4. It is hereby made the duty of the attorney
general of the state of Missouri or the prosecuting attorney
of any county or city in which service of process may be had

SB 1395 3
upon the person, firm, association, partnership, limited
liability company or corporation liable hereunder, to
institute all suits necessary for the recovery by the state
of Missouri of such amounts in the name and on behalf of the
state.
✓